Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-441
Commission designate permit areas.

The commission shall evaluate the areas of the Nebraska state park system and designate those areas, or portions of areas, for which a permit shall be required. The commission shall periodically reevaluate the Nebraska state park system and designate additional permit areas or reclassify permit areas as nonpermit areas as conditions and public use warrant.

Laws 1977, LB 81, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 199, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1109;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 151.